Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4702.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin SUSTAINABLE BUILDING STANDARDS ANALYSIS.new text end new text begin (a) The legislative auditor must conduct a cost-benefit analysis comparing the replacement of the application of the sustainable building guidelines under Minnesota Statutes, section 16B.325, to a capital project funded with an appropriation of state general obligation bond proceeds with all of the following sustainability-related building standards, codes, or programs: new text end new text begin (1) Leadership in Energy and Environmental Design (LEED) ratings; new text end new text begin (2) American Society of Heating, Refrigerating and Air-Conditioning Engineers (ASHRAE) standards and guidelines; new text end new text begin (3) Energy Star requirements; and new text end new text begin (4) the International Green Construction Code. new text end new text begin (b) The legislative auditor may include additional information in the analysis that the legislative auditor deems relevant. new text end new text begin (c) The legislative auditor must submit the analysis to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over capital investment on or before January 15, 2027. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION; SUSTAINABLE BUILDING STANDARDS STUDY.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the legislative auditor to conduct the analysis under section 1. This appropriation is onetime. new text end